Alabama, session 2026rs, SB299.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 45-3-60, Code of Alabama 1975, is
amended to read as follows:
"§45-3-60
In addition to any compensation or expense allowance
now provided by Section 12-19-192, the Coroner of Barbour
County shall receive an expense allowance and mileage to be
set by the county commission by resolution not to exceed four
hundred dollars ($400) a month expense allowance and fifty
cents ($.50) per mile a mileage reimbursement rate equal to
the Internal Revenue Service's business use rate, to be paid
from the county general fund."
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 1

1, 2026.
SB299 Enrolled






________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate



________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives


SB299
Senate 24-Feb-26
I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and passed
the Senate.

Patrick Harris,
Secretary.




House of Representatives
Passed: 03-Mar-26




By: Senator Beasley
Page 2